src/phonetics/text2ipa-sme.xfscript
 !These consonant clusters are also marginal clusters, so we need a detailed environment description. The environment description for strong grade is now simplified. They are not recognized as centers in unusual positions.
define dualposition   r %^ d     -> r ə %^     t , 
                      j %^ g     -> j j %^     k ,        
                      l %^ d     -> l l %^     t , 
                      s %^ t     -> s s %^     t ,
                      s %^ k     -> s s %^     k , 
                      š %^ t     -> š š %^     t ,
                      j %^ d     -> j j %^     t ,
                      l %^ g     -> l ə %^     k   
                      || WordBorder (Syll Syll) Cns* Vow+ _ Vow ;  
                       
                      
define QIIrealisation p %^ m     -> ʔ %^ m   ,
                      t %^ n     -> ʔ %^ n   ,
                      t %^ n j   -> ʔ %^ n j ,
                      k %^ ŋ     -> ʔ %^ n j ,
                      l %^ j     -> ʎ %^ ʎ    ,
                      h l %^ l   -> L   %^  L ,
                      h r %^ r   -> R   %^  R    
                      ||  Vow+ _ Vow ;

define QIII [         m m %^ p     |
                      m m %^ M p   |
                      m m %^ s     |
                      m m %^ v     |
                      m m %^ š     |
                      m m %^ š k   |

                      n n %^ ʔ n       |
                      m m %^ ʔ m       |
                      n j n j %^ ʔ n j |
                      n j n j %^ ʔ n j |

                      s s %^ p     |
                      s s %^ t     |
                      s s %^ k     |
                      s s %^ m     |

                      š š %^ p     |
                      š š %^ t     |
                      š š %^ k     |
                      š š %^ m     |
                      š š %^ v     |

                      n n %^ N t s |
                      n n %^ t     |
                      ŋ ŋ %^ k     |
                      ŋ ŋ %^ k     |
                      n n %^ j     |
                      n j %^ n j   |
                      ŋ ŋ %^ Ŋ k   |
                      ŋ ŋ %^ Ŋ k   |
                      n n %^ s     |
                      n n %^ N t   |
                      n n %^ v     |
                      n n %^ t s   |
                      n n %^ N t š |
                      n n %^   š   |
                      n n %^ s k   |
                      n n %^ s t   |
                      n n %^   t š |

                      l ə %^   r   |
                      l ə %^   p   |
                      l ə %^   f   |
                      l ə %^   k   |
                      l ə %^ h k   |
                      l ə %^ h p   |
                      l ə %^   s   |
                      l ə %^   v   |
                      l ə %^   š   |
                      ʎ ʎ %^ ʎ     |
                      l l %^ d s   |
                      l l %^ d š   |
                      l l %^ L t   |
                      l l %^   t   |
                      l l %^ L t s |
                      l l %^ L t š |
                      l l %^ s k   |
                      l l %^ s t   |
                      l ə %^ ʔ m   |
                      l ə %^ ʔ n j |
                      l l %^ ʔ n   |

                      w w %^ l     |
                      w w %^ t     |
                      w w %^ k     |
                      w w %^ W p   |
                      w w %^ j     |
                      w w %^ W k   |
                      w w %^ r     |
                      w w %^ L     |
                      w w %^ W t   |
                      w w %^ s k   |
                      w w %^ t s   |
                      w w %^ t n j |
                      w w %^ t n   |
                      w w %^ t š   |
                      w w %^ s t   |

                      j j %^     r |
                      j j %^     p |
                      j j %^     f |
                      j j %^     k |
                      j j %^     l |
                      j j %^   J k |
                      j j %^   J p |
                      j j %^     s |
                      j j %^     v |
                      j j %^     L |
                      j j %^   d s |
                      j j %^     M |
                      j j %^   J t |
                      j j %^     t |
                      j j %^ J t s |
                      j j %^     N |
                      j j %^   s t |
                      j j %^   s k |
                      j j %^   ʔ m |
                      j j %^   ʔ n |

                      r ə %^     p |
                      r ə %^     t |
                      r ə %^     f |
                      r ə %^     k |
                      r ə %^     j |
                      r ə %^   h k |
                      r ə %^   h p |
                      r ə %^     s |
                      r ə %^   h t |
                      r ə %^     v |
                      r ə %^     š |
                      r ə %^   d s |
                      r ə %^   d š |
                      r ə %^ h t s |
                      r ə %^ h t š |
                      r ə %^   s k |
                      r ə %^   s t |
                      r ə %^   ʔ m |
                      r ə %^ ʔ n j |

                      đ ə %^     p |
                      đ ə %^     k |
                      đ ə %^     j |
                      đ ə %^   ʔ m |
                      đ ə %^ ʔ n j |
                      
                      k k %^ h t š |
                      k k %^     š |
                      k k %^     s |
                      k k %^   s t |
                      k k %^   h t |
                      t t %^   h k |
                      t t %^     m |
                      
                      h h %^     t |
                      h h %^     p |
                      h h %^     k |
                      h h %^     č |
                      h h %^     c |
                      ɟ ɟ %^     c |
                      
                      d d  %^ t š |
                      b b  %^   p |
                      d d  %^   t |
                      d d  %^ t s |
                      g g  %^   k 

                    ] ;

! QII rule is not exhaustive, s %^ t, s %^ k and š %^ t are removed because they are also marginal consonants, and we do not want them to be treated as a center.                                     
define QII [          m p %^ p     |
                      m M %^ p     |
                      m s %^ s     |
                      m š %^ š     |
                      m š %^ k     |

                      ʔ %^ n       |
                      ʔ %^ m       |
                      ʔ %^ n j     |

                      s %^ p       |
                      s %^ m       |
                      š %^ p       |
                      š %^ k       |
                      š %^ m       |
                      š %^ v       |
                      t %^ k       |
                      t %^ m       |

                      n N %^ t s   |
                      n t %^ t     |
                      ŋ k %^ k     |
                      ŋ k %^ k     |
                      ŋ Ŋ %^ k     |
                      n s %^ s     |
                      n N %^ t     |
                      n t %^ t s   |
                      n N %^ t š   |
                      n š %^ š     |
                      n  %^ s k    |
                      n  %^ s t    |
                      n t %^ t š   |

                      l p %^ p     |
                      l f %^ f     |
                      l k %^ k     |
                      l L %^ k     |
                      l L %^ p     |
                      l s %^ s     |
                      l v %^ v     |
                      l š %^ š     |
                      ʎ %^ ʎ       |
                      l t %^ t s   |
                      l t %^ t š   |
                      l L %^ t     |
                      l t %^ t     |
                      l L %^ t s   |
                      l L %^ t š   |
                      l s %^ s     |
                      l s %^ t     |
                      l m %^ m     | 
                      l n j %^ n j |
                      l n %^ n     |

                      w l %^ l     |
                      w s %^ s     |
                      w š %^ š     |
                      w t %^ t     |
                      w k %^ k     |
                      w W %^ p     |
                      w j %^ j     |
                      w W %^ k     |
                      w r %^ r     |
                      w L %^ L     |
                      w W %^ t     |
                      w W %^ t s   |
                      w W %^ t š   |
                      w s %^ k     |
                      w t %^ t s   |
                      w n j %^ n j |
                      w n %^ n     |
                      w t %^ t š   |
                      w s %^ t     |

                      j r %^ r     |
                      j p %^ p     |
                      j f %^ f     |
                      j k %^ k     |
                      j l %^ l     |
                      j J %^ k     |
                      j J %^ p     |
                      j s %^ s     |
                      j v %^ v     |
                      j L %^ L     |
                      j t %^ t s   |
                      j M %^ M     |
                      j J %^ t     |
                      j t %^ t     |
                      j J %^ t s   |
                      j N %^ N     |
                      j s %^ t     |
                      j s %^ k     |
                      j m %^ m     |
                      j n %^ n     |
                      

                      r p %^ p     |
                      r t %^ t     |
                      r f %^ f     |
                      r k %^ k     |
                      r j %^ j     |
                      r R %^ k     |
                      r R %^ p     |
                      r s %^ s     |
                      r R %^ t     |
                      r v %^ v     |
                      r š %^ š     |
                      r t %^ t s   |
                      r t %^ t š   |
                      r R %^ t s   |
                      r R %^ t š   |
                      r s %^ k     |
                      r s %^ t     |
                      r ʔ %^ m     |
                      r ʔ %^ n j   |
                      r ʔ %^ n     |

                      đ p %^ p     |
                      đ v %^ v     |
                      đ k %^ k     |
                      đ j %^ j     |
                      đ m %^ m     |
                      đ n j %^ n j |
                      
                      
                      h %^ t      |
                      h %^ p      |
                      h %^ k      |
                      h %^ č      |
                      h %^ c      |
                      c  %^ c     |
                      
                      t %^ t š   |
                      p %^ p     |
                      t %^ t     |
                      t %^ t s   |
                      k %^ k     |
                      
                      đ %^ đ     |
                      f %^ f     |
                      l %^ l     |
                      m %^ m     |
                      n %^ n     |
                      r %^ r     |
                      ŋ %^ ŋ     |
                      s %^ s     |
                      š %^ š     |
                      ŧ %^ ŧ     |
                      v %^ v     
                      
                      
                    ] ;

define centre [ QIII | QII | Dummy Cns* %^ Cns* ] ;



define olju l %^ j -> l ə %^ j || WordBorder (s) o _ u , 
                                  WordBorder  p  u _ a ,
								  WordBorder  b  u _ o ;
								  
define iija j %^ j -> i %^ j || i _ ;

define FinalLightT t -> h ||       _ StressBorder ;

define FinalLightD d -> h || Vow j _ StressBorder ;
